Utah statutes.
76-8-110.   Peace officer prohibited from acting as compensated collection agent for collection agencies or creditors.

(1)  A peace officer may not have any interest in any collection agency or act as a compensated collection agent for any creditor or collection agency.

(2)  A person that violates this section is guilty of a class C misdemeanor.

